Maryland, session 2025, HB0693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Financial Institutions
SUBTITLE 12. COMMERCIAL FINANCING.
12–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “CLOSED–END FINANCING” MEANS A CLOSED–END EXTENSION OF
CREDIT, SECURED OR UNSECURED, INCLUDING EQUIPMENT FINANCING, THAT:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0693*

HOUSE BILL 693
(I) DOES NOT MEET THE DEFINITION OF A LEASE UNDER
ARTICLE 2A OF THE UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE; AND
(II) THE PROCEEDS OF WHICH A RECIPIENT DOES NOT INTEND
TO USE PRIMARILY FOR PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES.
(2) “CLOSED–END FINANCING” INCLUDES FINANCING THAT HAS AN
ESTABLISHED PRINCIPAL AMOUNT AND DURATION.
(C) “COMMERCIAL FINANCING” MEANS OPEN–END FINANCING,
CLOSED–END FINANCING, SALES–BASED FINANCING, A FACTORING TRANSACTION,
OR ANOTHER FORM OF FINANCING, THE PROCEEDS OF WHICH THE RECIPIENT DOES
NOT INTEND TO USE PRIMARILY FOR PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD
PURPOSES.
(D) “FACTORING TRANSACTION” MEANS AN ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE
PURCHASE TRANSACTION:
(1) THAT INCLUDES AN AGREEMENT TO PURCHASE, TRANSFER, OR
SELL A LEGALLY ENFORCEABLE CLAIM FOR PAYMENT HELD BY A RECIPIENT FOR
GOODS THE RECIPIENT HAS SUPPLIED OR SERVICES THE RECIPIENT HAS RENDERED
THAT HAVE BEEN ORDERED BUT FOR WHICH PAYMENT HAS NOT BEEN MADE; AND
(2) THE PROCEEDS OF WHICH THE RECIPIENT DOES NOT INTEND TO
USE PRIMARILY FOR PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES.
(E) (1) “FINANCE CHARGE” MEANS THE COST OF COMMERCIAL
FINANCING REPRESENTED AS A DOLLAR AMOUNT.
(2) “FINANCE CHARGE” INCLUDES:
(I) A CHARGE PAYABLE DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY BY A
RECIPIENT AND IMPOSED DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY BY A PROVIDER AS AN
INCIDENT TO OR A CONDITION OF THE EXTENSION OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING;
(II) A CHARGE THAT WOULD BE INCLUDED UNDER 12 C.F.R. §
1026.4 IF A TRANSACTION WERE SUBJECT TO 12 C.F.R. § 1026.4; AND
(III) ANY ADDITIONAL CHARGES DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSIONER.
(F) (1) “OPEN–END FINANCING” MEANS AN AGREEMENT FOR ONE OR
MORE EXTENSIONS OF SECURED OR UNSECURED OPEN–END CREDIT, THE

HOUSE BILL 693 3
PROCEEDS OF WHICH A RECIPIENT DOES NOT INTEND TO USE PRIMARILY FOR
PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES.
(2) “OPEN–END FINANCING” INCLUDES CREDIT EXTENDED BY A
PROVIDER UNDER A PLAN IN WHICH:
(I) THE PROVIDER REASONABLY CONTEMPLATES REPEATED
TRANSACTIONS;
(II) THE PROVIDER MAY IMPOSE A FINANCE CHARGE ON AN
OUTSTANDING UNPAID BALANCE; AND
(III) THE AMOUNT OF CREDIT THAT MAY BE EXTENDED TO A
RECIPIENT DURING THE TERM OF THE PLAN, UP TO A LIMIT THAT THE PROVIDER
SETS, IS GENERALLY MADE AVAILABLE TO THE EXTENT THAT ANY OUTSTANDING
BALANCE IS REPAID.
(G) (1) “PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON THAT EXTENDS A SPECIFIC OFFER
OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING TO A RECIPIENT.
(2) “PROVIDER” INCLUDES A PERSON THAT SOLICITS AND PRESENTS
A SPECIFIC OFFER OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING ON BEHALF OF A THIRD PARTY.
(H) (1) “RECIPIENT” MEANS A PERSON, OR THE PERSON’S AUTHORIZED
REPRESENTATIVE, THAT APPLIES FOR COMMERCIAL FINANCING AND IS MADE A
SPECIFIC OFFER OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING BY A PROVIDER.
(2) “RECIPIENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PERSON ACTING AS A
BROKER.
(I) (1) “SALES–BASED FINANCING” MEANS A TRANSACTION:
(I) THAT IS REPAID BY A RECIPIENT TO A PROVIDER OVER TIME
AS A PERCENTAGE OF SALES OR REVENUE, IN WHICH THE PAYMENT AMOUNT MAY
INCREASE OR DECREASE ACCORDING TO THE VOLUME OF SALES MADE OR REVENUE
RECEIVED BY THE RECIPIENT; AND
(II) THE PROCEEDS OF WHICH THE RECIPIENT DOES NOT
INTEND TO USE PRIMARILY FOR PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES.
(2) “SALES–BASED FINANCING” INCLUDES A TRANSACTION
CONTAINING A TRUE–UP MECHANISM UNDER WHICH THE FINANCING IS REPAID AS
A FIXED PAYMENT BUT PROVIDES FOR A RECONCILIATION PROCESS THAT ADJUSTS
THE PAYMENT TO AN AMOUNT THAT IS A PERCENTAGE OF SALES OR REVENUE.

HOUSE BILL 693
(J) “SPECIFIC OFFER” MEANS THE TERMS OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING
THAT ARE QUOTED TO A RECIPIENT, BASED ON INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM OR
ABOUT THE RECIPIENT, WHICH IF ACCEPTED BY THE RECIPIENT ARE BINDING ON A
PROVIDER, AS APPLICABLE, SUBJECT TO REQUIREMENTS STATED IN THE TERMS OF
THE COMMERCIAL FINANCING.
12–1202.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) (I) A FEDERAL OR STATE BANK, CREDIT UNION, OR SAVINGS
ASSOCIATION; OR
(II) A SUBSIDIARY OR AFFILIATE OF AN ORGANIZATION LISTED
IN ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM;
(2) A PERSON ACTING AS A TECHNOLOGY SERVICES PROVIDER TO AN
ENTITY EXEMPT UNDER THIS SECTION FOR USE AS PART OF THE ENTITY’S
COMMERCIAL FINANCING PROGRAM IF THE PERSON DOES NOT HAVE AN INTEREST,
ARRANGEMENT, OR AGREEMENT TO PURCHASE ANY INTEREST IN THE COMMERCIAL
FINANCING EXTENDED BY THE ENTITY IN CONNECTION WITH THE COMMERCIAL
FINANCING PROGRAM;
(3) A LENDER REGULATED UNDER THE FEDERAL FARM CREDIT ACT;
(4) A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION SECURED BY REAL
PROPERTY;
(5) A LEASE AS DEFINED IN ARTICLE 2A OF THE UNIFORM
COMMERCIAL CODE;
(6) A PROVIDER OR OTHER PERSON WHO MAKES NOT MORE THAN
FIVE COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTIONS IN THE STATE IN A 12–MONTH
PERIOD;
(7) A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION OF MORE THAN
$2,500,000;
(8) A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION:
(I) IN WHICH THE RECIPIENT IS:

HOUSE BILL 693 5
1. A DEALER, OR AN AFFILIATE OF A DEALER, AS
DEFINED IN § 11–111 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; OR
2. A RENTAL VEHICLE COMPANY, OR AN AFFILIATE OF A
RENTAL VEHICLE COMPANY, AS DEFINED IN § 18–108 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE; AND
(II) MADE UNDER A COMMERCIAL FINANCING AGREEMENT OR
COMMERCIAL OPEN–END CREDIT PLAN OF AT LEAST $50,000, INCLUDING A
COMMERCIAL LOAN MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE COMMERCIAL FINANCING
TRANSACTION;
(9) A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION THAT IS A FACTORING
TRANSACTION, AN ADVANCE, OR A SIMILAR TRANSACTION OF ACCOUNTS
RECEIVABLE OWED TO A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER BECAUSE OF A PATIENT’S
PERSONAL INJURY TREATED BY THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER; OR
(10) A PREMIUM FINANCE AGREEMENT AS DEFINED IN § 23–101 OF
THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
12–1203.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 12–1207 OF THIS SUBTITLE, FOR PURPOSES
OF THIS SUBTITLE, AN ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE SHALL BE:
(1) EXPRESSED AS A YEARLY RATE, INCLUDING ALL FEES AND
FINANCE CHARGES; AND
(2) CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL TRUTH IN
LENDING ACT.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS
SECTION, AN ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE SHALL BE CALCULATED BASED ON THE
ESTIMATED TERM OF REPAYMENT AND THE PROJECTED PERIODIC PAYMENT
AMOUNTS OF A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER
FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATION WOULD REQUIRE AN ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE TO
BE CALCULATED FOR A CERTAIN TRANSACTION.
(C) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO IMPOSE ANY LIABILITY ON A
PROVIDER THAT CHARGES AN ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE THAT DIFFERS FROM THE
ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE DISCLOSED BY THE PROVIDER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE OR ANY REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 693
12–1204.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ESTIMATED TERM OF REPAYMENT” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF
TIME REQUIRED FOR THE PERIODIC PAYMENTS MADE BY A RECIPIENT IN A
SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION TO EQUAL THE TOTAL AMOUNT REQUIRED
TO BE REPAID.
(3) “TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT” MEANS THE DISBURSEMENT
AMOUNT OF A SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION PLUS THE FINANCE CHARGE.
(B) (1) A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO
A RECIPIENT WHEN EXTENDING A SPECIFIC OFFER OF SALES–BASED FINANCING:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE SALES–BASED FINANCING AND
THE DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT, IF DIFFERENT FROM THE FINANCING AMOUNT,
MINUS ANY FEES DEDUCTED OR WITHHELD AT DISBURSEMENT;
(II) THE FINANCE CHARGE;
(III) THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF THE
SALES–BASED FINANCING, USING THE WORDS “ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE” OR THE
ABBREVIATION “APR”;
(IV) THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT;
(V) THE ESTIMATED TERM OF REPAYMENT;
(VI) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PROJECTED PERIODIC PAYMENT AMOUNTS;
(VII) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY OTHER POTENTIAL FEES AND
CHARGES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE CHARGE, INCLUDING DRAW FEES, LATE
PAYMENT FEES, AND RETURNED PAYMENT FEES; AND
(VIII) IF APPLICABLE, A DESCRIPTION OF COLLATERAL
REQUIREMENTS OR SECURITY INTERESTS.
(2) (I) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE FIXED, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY; AND

HOUSE BILL 693 7
2. IF THE PAYMENT FREQUENCY IS OTHER THAN
MONTHLY, THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(II) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE VARIABLE, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT SCHEDULE OR A DESCRIPTION OF THE
METHOD USED TO CALCULATE THE AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY OF PAYMENTS; AND
2. THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED
PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(C) (1) IF A RECIPIENT PAYS OFF OR REFINANCES THE SALES–BASED
FINANCING BEFORE THE END OF THE SCHEDULED REPAYMENT PERIOD, A
PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE WHETHER THE RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO
PAY:
(I) ANY FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST
ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S LAST PAYMENT; AND
(II) ANY ADDITIONAL FEES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE
CHARGE.
(2) IF A RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY ADDITIONAL
FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S
LAST PAYMENT, A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE PERCENTAGE OF ANY UNPAID
PORTION OF THE FINANCE CHARGE AND THE MAXIMUM DOLLAR AMOUNT THE
RECIPIENT COULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY.
12–1205.
(A) (1) A PROVIDER SHALL USE THE PROJECTED SALES VOLUME OF A
RECIPIENT TO CALCULATE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION RELATED TO A
SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION:
(I) THE ESTIMATED TERM OF REPAYMENT AND THE
PROJECTED PAYMENT AMOUNTS OF A SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION; AND
(II) THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF A
SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION.
(2) THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF A SALES–BASED
FINANCING TRANSACTION SHALL BE CALCULATED:

HOUSE BILL 693
(I) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL TRUTH IN LENDING
ACT AND REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. § 1026.22; AND
(II) BASED ON THE ESTIMATED TERM OF REPAYMENT AND
PROJECTED SALES VOLUME OF A RECIPIENT.
(B) (1) A PROVIDER MAY CALCULATE THE PROJECTED SALES VOLUME OF
A RECIPIENT USING EITHER THE HISTORICAL METHOD OR THE OPT–IN METHOD.
(2) (I) A PROVIDER THAT USES THE HISTORICAL METHOD TO
CALCULATE THE PROJECTED SALES VOLUME OF A RECIPIENT SHALL USE AN
AVERAGE HISTORICAL VOLUME OF SALES OR REVENUE.
(II) A PROVIDER SHALL FIX THE HISTORICAL TIME PERIOD
USED TO CALCULATE THE AVERAGE HISTORICAL VOLUME AND USE THE SAME TIME
PERIOD FOR ALL DISCLOSURE PURPOSES FOR ANY SALES–BASED FINANCING
TRANSACTION PRODUCTS OFFERED.
(III) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (IV) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE FIXED HISTORICAL TIME PERIOD:
1. MAY NOT BE LESS THAN 1 MONTH AND MAY NOT
EXCEED 12 MONTHS; AND
2. SHALL BE THE TIME PERIOD DIRECTLY BEFORE THE
SPECIFIC OFFER WAS MADE.
(IV) A PROVIDER MAY CHOOSE TO USE THE AVERAGE SALES FOR
THE SAME NUMBER OF MONTHS AS THE PROVIDER WOULD HAVE USED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH WITH THE HIGHEST SALES VOLUME
WITHIN THE PAST 12 MONTHS.
(3) A PROVIDER MAY USE THE OPT–IN METHOD TO DETERMINE THE
INFORMATION LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION BY USING A
PROJECTED SALES VOLUME THAT THE PROVIDER CHOOSES FOR EACH DISCLOSURE
IF THE RECIPIENT PARTICIPATES IN A REVIEW PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE
COMMISSIONER.
(C) A PROVIDER SHALL NOTIFY THE COMMISSIONER OF WHICH OF THE TWO
METHODS THE PROVIDER INTENDS TO USE WHEN CALCULATING THE ESTIMATED
ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF EACH SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION.

HOUSE BILL 693 9
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, A PROVIDER THAT
ELECTS TO USE THE OPT–IN METHOD UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(3) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL REPORT TO THE COMMISSIONER ON:
(I) THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATES GIVEN TO
EACH RECIPIENT; AND
(II) THE ACTUAL ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATES OF EACH
COMPLETED SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION.
(2) (I) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL CONTAIN ANY INFORMATION THE COMMISSIONER CONSIDERS
NECESSARY TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE DEVIATION BETWEEN THE ESTIMATED
ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATES AND ACTUAL ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATES OF
COMPLETED SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTIONS IS REASONABLE.
(II) THE COMMISSIONER MAY CONSIDER EXTRAORDINARY
CIRCUMSTANCES WHEN DETERMINING WHETHER THE PROVIDER’S DEVIATION
BETWEEN THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE AND ACTUAL ANNUAL
PERCENTAGE RATE OF A SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTION IS REASONABLE.
(III) IF THE COMMISSIONER FINDS THAT THERE WAS AN
UNREASONABLE DEVIATION BETWEEN ESTIMATED AND ACTUAL ANNUAL
PERCENTAGE RATES OF SALES–BASED FINANCING TRANSACTIONS, THE
COMMISSIONER MAY REQUIRE THE PROVIDER TO USE THE HISTORICAL METHOD
INSTEAD OF THE OPT–IN METHOD IN DETERMINING THE PROJECTED SALES VOLUME
OF THE RECIPIENT.
12–1206.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT” MEANS THE
DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT OF A CLOSED–END FINANCING TRANSACTION PLUS THE
FINANCE CHARGE.
(B) (1) A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO
A RECIPIENT WHEN EXTENDING A SPECIFIC OFFER FOR CLOSED–END FINANCING:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE CLOSED–END FINANCING AND
THE DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT, IF DIFFERENT FROM THE FINANCING AMOUNT,
MINUS ANY FEES DEDUCTED OR WITHHELD AT DISBURSEMENT;
(II) THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT;
(III) THE FINANCE CHARGE;

HOUSE BILL 693
(IV) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF THE CLOSED–END
FINANCING, USING THE WORDS “ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE” OR THE
ABBREVIATION “APR”;
(V) THE TERM OF THE FINANCING;
(VI) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PROJECTED PERIODIC PAYMENT AMOUNTS;
(VII) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY OTHER POTENTIAL FEES AND
CHARGES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE CHARGE, INCLUDING DRAW FEES, LATE
PAYMENT FEES, AND RETURNED PAYMENT FEES; AND
(VIII) IF APPLICABLE, A DESCRIPTION OF COLLATERAL
REQUIREMENTS OR SECURITY INTERESTS.
(2) (I) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE FIXED, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY; AND
2. IF THE PAYMENT FREQUENCY IS OTHER THAN
MONTHLY, THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(II) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE VARIABLE, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT SCHEDULE OR A DESCRIPTION OF THE
METHOD USED TO CALCULATE THE AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY OF PAYMENTS; AND
2. THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED
PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(3) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE REQUIRED TO BE DISCLOSED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) EXPRESSED AS A YEARLY RATE, INCLUSIVE OF ANY FEES
AND FINANCE CHARGES THAT CANNOT BE AVOIDED BY A RECIPIENT; AND
(II) CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL TRUTH
IN LENDING ACT AND REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. § 1026.22, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATION WOULD REQUIRE THE CALCULATION.

HOUSE BILL 693 11
(C) (1) IF A RECIPIENT PAYS OFF OR REFINANCES THE CLOSED–END
FINANCING BEFORE THE END OF THE SCHEDULED REPAYMENT PERIOD, A
PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE WHETHER THE RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO
PAY:
(I) ANY FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST
ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S LAST PAYMENT; AND
(II) ANY ADDITIONAL FEES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE
CHARGE.
(2) IF A RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY ADDITIONAL
FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S
LAST PAYMENT, A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE PERCENTAGE OF ANY UNPAID
PORTION OF THE FINANCE CHARGE AND MAXIMUM DOLLAR AMOUNT THE
RECIPIENT COULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY.
12–1207.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT” MEANS THE DRAW
AMOUNT OF THE OPEN–END FINANCING TRANSACTION, MINUS ANY FEES DEDUCTED
OR WITHHELD AT DISBURSEMENT, PLUS THE FINANCE CHARGE.
(B) (1) WHEN CALCULATING THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, A PROVIDER SHALL ASSUME A DRAW AMOUNT
EQUAL TO THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF CREDIT AVAILABLE TO THE RECIPIENT IF
DRAWN AND HELD FOR THE DURATION OF THE TERM OR DRAW PERIOD.
(2) WHEN CALCULATING A FINANCE CHARGE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION, A PROVIDER SHALL ASSUME THAT THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF CREDIT
AVAILABLE TO THE RECIPIENT, IN EACH CASE, IS DRAWN AND HELD FOR THE
DURATION OF THE TERM OF THE DRAW PERIOD.
(C) (1) A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO
A RECIPIENT WHEN EXTENDING A SPECIFIC OFFER FOR OPEN–END FINANCING:
(I) THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF CREDIT AVAILABLE TO THE
RECIPIENT AND THE AMOUNT SCHEDULED TO BE DRAWN BY THE RECIPIENT AT THE
TIME THE OFFER IS EXTENDED, IF ANY, MINUS ANY FEES DEDUCTED OR WITHHELD
AT DISBURSEMENT;
(II) THE FINANCE CHARGE;
(III) THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT;

HOUSE BILL 693
(IV) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF THE COMMERCIAL
FINANCING, USING THE WORDS “ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE” OR THE
ABBREVIATION “APR”;
(V) THE TERM OF THE PLAN, IF APPLICABLE, OR THE PERIOD
OVER WHICH A DRAW IS AMORTIZED;
(VI) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PAYMENT FREQUENCY AND AMOUNTS;
(VII) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY OTHER POTENTIAL FEES AND
CHARGES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE CHARGE, INCLUDING DRAW FEES, LATE
PAYMENT FEES, AND RETURNED PAYMENT FEES; AND
(VIII) IF APPLICABLE, A DESCRIPTION OF COLLATERAL
REQUIREMENTS OR SECURITY INTERESTS.
(2) (I) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE FIXED, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY; AND
2. IF THE PAYMENT FREQUENCY IS OTHER THAN
MONTHLY, THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(II) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE VARIABLE, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT SCHEDULE OR A DESCRIPTION OF THE
METHOD USED TO CALCULATE THE AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY OF PAYMENTS; AND
2. THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED
PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(3) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE REQUIRED TO BE DISCLOSED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) EXPRESSED AS A NOMINAL YEARLY RATE, INCLUSIVE OF
ANY FEES AND FINANCE CHARGES THAT CANNOT BE AVOIDED BY A RECIPIENT;
(II) CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL TRUTH
IN LENDING ACT AND REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. § 1026.22; AND

HOUSE BILL 693 13
(III) BASED ON THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF CREDIT AVAILABLE
TO THE RECIPIENT AND THE TERM RESULTING FROM MAKING THE MINIMUM
REQUIRED PAYMENTS AS DISCLOSED, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER FEDERAL LAW OR
REGULATION WOULD REQUIRE THE CALCULATION.
(D) (1) IF A RECIPIENT PAYS OFF OR REFINANCES THE OPEN–END
FINANCING BEFORE THE END OF THE SCHEDULED REPAYMENT PERIOD, A
PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE WHETHER THE RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO
PAY:
(I) ANY FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST
ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S LAST PAYMENT; AND
(II) ANY ADDITIONAL FEES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE
CHARGE.
(2) IF A RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY ADDITIONAL
FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S
LAST PAYMENT, A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE PERCENTAGE OF ANY UNPAID
PORTION OF THE FINANCE CHARGE AND MAXIMUM DOLLAR AMOUNT THE
RECIPIENT COULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY.
12–1208.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FINANCE CHARGE” INCLUDES A DISCOUNT TAKEN ON THE FACE
VALUE OF THE ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE.
(3) “TOTAL PAYMENT AMOUNT” MEANS THE PURCHASE AMOUNT OF
THE FACTORING TRANSACTION PLUS THE FINANCE CHARGE.
(B) A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO A
RECIPIENT WHEN EXTENDING A SPECIFIC OFFER FOR A FACTORING TRANSACTION:
(1) THE AMOUNT OF THE RECEIVABLES PURCHASE PRICE PAID TO
THE RECIPIENT AND, IF DIFFERENT FROM THE PURCHASE PRICE, THE
DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT AFTER ANY FEES DEDUCTED OR WITHHELD AT
DISBURSEMENT;
(2) THE TOTAL PAYMENT AMOUNT;
(3) THE FINANCE CHARGE;

HOUSE BILL 693
(4) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF THE FACTORING
TRANSACTION, USING THE WORDS “ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE” OR THE
ABBREVIATION “APR”, CALCULATED ACCORDING TO THE FEDERAL TRUTH IN
LENDING ACT AND REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. § 1026, APPENDIX J, AS A “SINGLE
ADVANCE, SINGLE PAYMENT TRANSACTION”;
(5) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY OTHER POTENTIAL FEES AND CHARGES
THAT CAN BE AVOIDED BY THE RECIPIENT; AND
(6) A DESCRIPTION OF THE RECEIVABLES PURCHASED AND, IF
APPLICABLE, ANY ADDITIONAL COLLATERAL REQUIREMENTS OR SECURITY
INTERESTS.
(C) (1) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE
RATE SHALL BE CALCULATED ACCORDING TO THE FEDERAL TRUTH IN LENDING
ACT AND REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. § 1026, APPENDIX J, AS A “SINGLE ADVANCE,
SINGLE PAYMENT TRANSACTION”, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER FEDERAL LAW OR
REGULATION WOULD REQUIRE AN ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE TO BE CALCULATED
FOR A CERTAIN TRANSACTION.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
PROVIDER SHALL USE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO CALCULATE THE
ESTIMATED ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION:
1. THE PURCHASE AMOUNT IS THE FINANCING AMOUNT;
2. THE PAYMENT AMOUNT IS THE PURCHASE AMOUNT
MINUS THE FINANCE CHARGE; AND
3. THE TERM OF THE FACTORING TRANSACTION IS
DETERMINED BY THE PAYMENT DUE DATE OF THE RECEIVABLES.
(II) A PROVIDER MAY ESTIMATE THE TERM FOR A FACTORING
TRANSACTION AS THE AVERAGE PAYMENT PERIOD, USING HISTORICAL DATA OVER
A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED THE PREVIOUS 12 MONTHS, CONCERNING PAYMENT
INVOICES PAID BY THE PARTY OWING THE ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE IN QUESTION.
12–1209.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT” MEANS THE
DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT OF A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION PLUS THE
FINANCE CHARGE.

HOUSE BILL 693 15
(B) A PROVIDER MAY EXTEND A SPECIFIC OFFER OF COMMERCIAL
FINANCING THAT IS NOT AN OPEN–END FINANCING, A CLOSED–END FINANCING, A
SALES–BASED FINANCING, OR A FACTORING TRANSACTION BUT OTHERWISE MEETS
THE DEFINITION OF COMMERCIAL FINANCING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) IF A PROVIDER EXTENDS A SPECIFIC OFFER THAT IS NOT AN
OPEN–END FINANCING, A CLOSED–END FINANCING, A SALES–BASED FINANCING, OR
A FACTORING TRANSACTION BUT OTHERWISE MEETS THE DEFINITION OF
COMMERCIAL FINANCING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE COMMERCIAL FINANCING
INCLUDING THE DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT, IF DIFFERENT FROM THE FINANCING
AMOUNT, MINUS ANY FEES DEDUCTED OR WITHHELD AT DISBURSEMENT;
(II) THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT;
(III) THE FINANCE CHARGE;
(IV) THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE OF THE COMMERCIAL
FINANCING, USING THE WORDS “ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE” OR THE
ABBREVIATION “APR”, EXPRESSED AS A YEARLY RATE, INCLUSIVE OF ANY FEES
AND FINANCE CHARGES, AND CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RELEVANT
SECTIONS OF THE FEDERAL TRUTH IN LENDING ACT, REGULATION Z, 12 C.F.R. §
1026.22, OR THIS ARTICLE, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER FEDERAL LAW, THE
REGULATION, OR THIS ARTICLE WOULD REQUIRE THE CALCULATION;
(V) THE TERM OF THE COMMERCIAL FINANCING;
(VI) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PAYMENT FREQUENCY AND AMOUNTS;
(VII) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY OTHER POTENTIAL FEES AND
CHARGES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE CHARGE, INCLUDING LATE PAYMENT
FEES AND RETURNED PAYMENT FEES; AND
(VIII) IF APPLICABLE, A DESCRIPTION OF COLLATERAL
REQUIREMENTS OR SECURITY INTERESTS.
(2) (I) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE FIXED, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY; AND

HOUSE BILL 693
2. IF THE PAYMENT FREQUENCY IS OTHER THAN
MONTHLY, THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(II) FOR PAYMENT AMOUNTS THAT ARE VARIABLE, A PROVIDER
SHALL DISCLOSE:
1. THE PAYMENT SCHEDULE OR A DESCRIPTION OF THE
METHOD USED TO CALCULATE THE AMOUNTS AND FREQUENCY OF PAYMENTS; AND
2. THE AMOUNT OF THE AVERAGE PROJECTED
PAYMENTS PER MONTH.
(D) (1) IF A RECIPIENT PAYS OFF OR REFINANCES THE COMMERCIAL
FINANCING BEFORE THE END OF THE SCHEDULED REPAYMENT PERIOD, A
PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE WHETHER THE RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO
PAY:
(I) ANY FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST
ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S LAST PAYMENT; AND
(II) ANY ADDITIONAL FEES NOT INCLUDED IN THE FINANCE
CHARGE.
(2) IF A RECIPIENT WOULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY ADDITIONAL
FINANCE CHARGES OTHER THAN THE INTEREST ACCRUED SINCE THE RECIPIENT’S
LAST PAYMENT, A PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE PERCENTAGE OF ANY UNPAID
PORTION OF THE FINANCE CHARGE AND MAXIMUM DOLLAR AMOUNT THE
RECIPIENT COULD BE REQUIRED TO PAY.
12–1210.
(A) A PROVIDER MAY REQUIRE A RECIPIENT TO PAY OFF THE BALANCE OF
AN EXISTING COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION FROM THE SAME PROVIDER
AS A CONDITION OF OBTAINING A NEW OR RENEWAL COMMERCIAL FINANCING
TRANSACTION.
(B) IF A PROVIDER REQUIRES A RECIPIENT TO PAY OFF A COMMERCIAL
FINANCING TRANSACTION BEFORE OBTAINING A NEW OR RENEWAL COMMERCIAL
FINANCING TRANSACTION, THE PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE:
(1) THE AMOUNT OF THE NEW OR RENEWAL COMMERCIAL FINANCING
THAT WILL BE USED TO PAY OFF THE PORTION OF THE EXISTING COMMERCIAL
FINANCING THAT CONSISTS OF ANY REQUIRED PREPAYMENT CHARGES; AND

HOUSE BILL 693 17
(2) ANY UNPAID INTEREST THAT WAS NOT FORGIVEN AT THE TIME
THE RECIPIENT ENTERED INTO THE NEW OR RENEWAL COMMERCIAL FINANCING.
(C) (1) FOR FINANCING FOR WHICH THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT IS
CALCULATED AS A FIXED AMOUNT, THE PREPAYMENT CHARGE IS EQUAL TO THE
ORIGINAL FINANCE CHARGE MULTIPLIED BY THE AMOUNT OF THE NEW OR
RENEWAL COMMERCIAL FINANCING USED TO PAY OFF THE EXISTING COMMERCIAL
FINANCING TRANSACTION AS A PERCENTAGE OF THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT,
MINUS ANY PORTION OF THE TOTAL REPAYMENT AMOUNT FORGIVEN BY THE
PROVIDER AT THE TIME OF PREPAYMENT.
(2) IF THE PREPAYMENT CHARGE IS MORE THAN ZERO, THE
PROVIDER SHALL RECORD THE AMOUNT AS THE ANSWER TO THE FOLLOWING
QUESTION:
“DOES THE NEW OR RENEWAL COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION INCLUDE
ANY AMOUNT THAT IS USED TO PAY UNPAID FINANCE CHARGES OR FEES, ALSO
KNOWN AS DOUBLE DIPPING? YES, (ENTER AMOUNT)”.
(D) IF THE DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT OF THE NEW OR RENEWAL
COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION WILL BE REDUCED TO PAY DOWN ANY
UNPAID PORTION OF THE OUTSTANDING BALANCE OF THE EXISTING COMMERCIAL
FINANCING, THE PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE THE ACTUAL DOLLAR AMOUNT BY
WHICH THE DISBURSEMENT AMOUNT WILL BE REDUCED.
12–1211.
A RECIPIENT SHALL SIGN, MANUALLY OR ELECTRONICALLY, EACH
APPLICABLE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE BEFORE A PROVIDER
MAY ALLOW THE RECIPIENT TO PROCEED WITH THE COMMERCIAL FINANCING
APPLICATION.
12–1212.
(A) (1) NOTHING IN THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PREVENT A
PROVIDER FROM DISCLOSING ADDITIONAL INFORMATION TO A RECIPIENT
REGARDING A COMMERCIAL FINANCING TRANSACTION.
(2) IF A PROVIDER PROVIDES AN ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURE TO A
RECIPIENT OTHER THAN WHAT IS REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE, THE ADDITIONAL
DISCLOSURE IS NOT CONSIDERED A REQUIRED DISCLOSURE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) IF ADDITIONAL METRICS OF FINANCING COSTS ARE DISCLOSED
OR USED IN THE APPLICATION PROCESS FOR COMMERCIAL FINANCING, THE

HOUSE BILL 693
ADDITIONAL METRICS MAY NOT BE PRESENTED AS A RATE IF THEY ARE NOT THE
ANNUAL INTEREST RATE OR THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATE.
(2) THE TERM “INTEREST”, WHEN USED TO DESCRIBE A PERCENTAGE
RATE, MAY BE USED ONLY TO DESCRIBE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE RATES, INCLUDING
THE ANNUAL INTEREST RATE.
(C) IF A PROVIDER STATES A RATE OF FINANCE CHARGE OR A FINANCING
AMOUNT TO A RECIPIENT DURING THE APPLICATION PROCESS FOR COMMERCIAL
FINANCING, THE PROVIDER SHALL ALSO STATE THE RATE AS AN “ANNUAL
PERCENTAGE RATE”, USING THAT TERM OR THE ABBREVIATION “APR”.
12–1213.
(A) TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS SUBSTANTIALLY THE SAME AS REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE NEW
YORK STATE DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES REGARDING COMMERCIAL
FINANCING.
(B) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL APPROVE THE USE OF COMMERCIAL
FINANCING DISCLOSURE FORMS APPROVED FOR USE IN OTHER STATES WITH
COMMERCIAL FINANCING DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS THAT ARE SUBSTANTIALLY
SIMILAR TO OR EXCEED THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
12–1214.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY NOT
EXCEEDING:
(I) $2,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) $10,000 FOR EACH WILLFUL VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ORDER ADDITIONAL RELIEF,
INCLUDING RESTITUTION OR A PERMANENT OR PRELIMINARY INJUNCTION ON
BEHALF OF A RECIPIENT AFFECTED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) IF A COMPLAINT ABOUT A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS FILED WITH
THE COMMISSIONER, THE COMMISSIONER MAY INVESTIGATE THE COMPLAINT AND
USE ANY OF THE INVESTIGATIVE AND ENFORCEMENT POWERS PROVIDED UNDER
TITLE 2, SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.

HOUSE BILL 693 19